Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201644-8216
Creation of special purpose financial captive insurers; applicability of section; form of organization; powers; duties; powers of director; limitation on dividends; confidentiality.

(1) This section provides for the creation of special purpose financial captive insurers to diversify and broaden insurers' access to sources of capital.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Counterparty means a special purpose financial captive insurer's parent or affiliated entity, which is an insurer domiciled in Nebraska that cedes life insurance risks to the special purpose financial captive insurer pursuant to the special purpose financial captive insurer contract;

(b) Guaranty of a parent means an agreement to pay specified obligations of the special purpose financial captive insurer by a parent of the special purpose financial captive insurer approved by the director that is not a counterparty and the guarantor has sufficient equity, less the equity of all counterparties that are subsidiaries of the guarantor, to satisfy the agreement during the life of the guaranty;

(c) Insolvency or insolvent means that the special purpose financial captive insurer is unable to pay its obligations when they are due, unless those obligations are the subject of a bona fide dispute;

(d) Insurance securitization means a package of related risk transfer instruments, capital market offerings, and facilitating administrative agreements, under which a special purpose financial captive insurer obtains proceeds either directly or indirectly through the issuance of securities, and may hold the proceeds in trust to secure the obligations of the special purpose financial captive insurer under one or more special purpose financial captive insurer contracts, in that the investment risk to the holders of the securities is contingent upon the obligations of the special purpose financial captive insurer to the counterparty under the special purpose financial captive insurer contract in accordance with the transaction terms and pursuant to the Captive Insurers Act;

(e) Organizational document means the special purpose financial captive insurer's articles of incorporation, articles of organization, bylaws, operating agreement, or other foundational documents that establish the special purpose financial captive insurer as a legal entity or prescribes its existence;

(f) Permitted investments means those investments that meet the qualifications set forth in section 44-8211;

(g) Securities means debt obligations, equity investments, surplus certificates, surplus notes, funding agreements, derivatives, and other legal forms of financial instruments;

(h) Special purpose financial captive insurer means a captive insurer which has received a certificate of authority from the director for the limited purposes provided for in this section;

(i) Special purpose financial captive insurer contract means a contract between the special purpose financial captive insurer and the counterparty pursuant to which the special purpose financial captive insurer agrees to provide insurance or reinsurance protection to the counterparty for risks associated with the counterparty's insurance or reinsurance business; and

(j) Special purpose financial captive insurer securities means the securities issued by a special purpose financial captive insurer.

(3)(a) The provisions of the Captive Insurers Act, other than those in subdivision (3)(b) of this section, apply to a special purpose financial captive insurer. If a conflict occurs between a provision of the act not in this section and a provision of this section, the latter controls.

(b) The requirements of this section shall not apply to specific special purpose financial captive insurers if the director finds a specific requirement is inappropriate due to the nature of the risks to be insured by the special purpose financial captive insurer and if the special purpose financial captive insurer meets criteria established by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director.

(c) In determining whether to issue a certificate of authority or to approve an amended plan of operation for a special purpose financial captive insurer required under section 44-8205, the director may consider any additional factors the director may deem relevant, including the specific type of life insurance risks insured by the special purpose financial captive insurer, the financial ability of a parent that issues a guaranty pursuant to this section to satisfy such guaranty, and any actuarial opinions or other statements or documents required by the director to evaluate such application.

(d) At the time a special purpose financial captive insurer files an application for a certificate of authority or submits an amended plan of operation in accordance with section 44-8205, and on each date the special purpose financial captive insurer is required to file an annual financial statement in this state, a senior actuarial officer of each ceding insurer shall file with the director a certification that the ceding insurer's transactions with the special purpose financial captive insurer are not being used to gain an unfair advantage in the pricing of the ceding insurer's products. A ceding insurer shall not be deemed to have gained an unfair advantage if the pricing of the policies and contracts reinsured by the special purpose financial captive insurer reflects, at the time those policies and contracts were issued, a reasonable long-term estimate of the cost to the ceding insurer of an alternative third-party transaction and utilizes current pricing assumptions.

(4) A special purpose financial captive insurer may be established as a stock corporation or other form of organization approved by the director.

(5)(a) A special purpose financial captive insurer may not issue a contract for assumption of risk or indemnification of loss other than a special purpose financial captive insurer contract. However, the special purpose financial captive insurer may cede risks assumed through a special purpose financial captive insurer contract to third-party reinsurers through the purchase of reinsurance or retrocession protection if approved by the director.

(b) A special purpose financial captive insurer may enter into contracts and conduct other commercial activities related or incidental to and necessary to fulfill the purposes of the special purpose financial captive insurer contract, insurance securitization, and this section. Those activities may include, but are not limited to: Entering into special purpose financial captive insurer contracts; entering into agreements in connection with obtaining guaranties of its parent; issuing securities of the special purpose financial captive insurer in accordance with applicable securities law; complying with the terms of these contracts or securities; entering into trust, swap, tax, administration, reimbursement, or fiscal agent transactions; or complying with trust indenture, reinsurance, retrocession, and other agreements necessary or incidental to effectuate a special purpose financial captive insurer contract or an insurance securitization in compliance with this section and in the plan of operation approved by the director.

(6)(a) A special purpose financial captive insurer may issue securities, subject to and in accordance with applicable law, its approved plan of operation, and its organization documents.

(b) A special purpose financial captive insurer, in connection with the issuance of securities, may enter into and perform all of its obligations under any required contracts to facilitate the issuance of these securities.

(c) The obligation to repay principal or interest, or both, on the securities issued by the special purpose financial captive insurer shall be designed to reflect the risk associated with the obligations of the special purpose financial captive insurer to the counterparty under the special purpose financial captive insurer contract.

(7) A special purpose financial captive insurer may enter into swap agreements, or other forms of asset management agreements, including guaranteed investment contracts, or other transactions that have the objective of leveling timing differences in funding of up-front or ongoing transaction expenses or managing asset, credit, prepayment, or interest rate risk of the investments in the trust to ensure that the investments are sufficient to assure payment or repayment of the securities, and related interest or principal payments, issued pursuant to a special purpose financial captive insurer insurance securitization transaction or the obligations of the special purpose financial captive insurer under the special purpose financial captive insurer contract or for any other purpose approved by the director. All asset management agreements entered into by the special purpose financial captive insurer must be approved by the director.

(8)(a) A special purpose financial captive insurer, at any given time, may enter into and effectuate a special purpose financial captive insurer contract with a counterparty if the special purpose financial captive insurer contract obligates the special purpose financial captive insurer to indemnify the counterparty for losses and contingent obligations of the special purpose financial captive insurer under the special purpose financial captive insurer contract are securitized through a special purpose financial captive insurer insurance securitization, which security for such obligations may be funded and secured with assets held in trust for the benefit of the counterparty pursuant to agreements contemplated by this section and invested in a manner that meet the criteria as provided in section 44-8211.

(b) A special purpose financial captive insurer may enter into agreements with affiliated companies and third parties and conduct business necessary to fulfill its obligations and administrative duties incidental to the insurance securitization and the special purpose financial captive insurer contract. The agreements may include management and administrative services agreements and other allocation and cost-sharing agreements, or swap and asset management agreements, or both, or agreements for other contemplated types of transactions provided in this section.

(c) A special purpose financial captive insurer contract must contain provisions that:

(i) Require the special purpose financial captive insurer to either (A) enter into a trust agreement specifying what recoverables or reserves, or both, the agreement is to cover and to establish a trust account for the benefit of the counterparty and the security holders or (B) establish such other method of security acceptable to the director, including letters of credit or guaranties of a parent as described in subsection (9) of this section;

(ii) Stipulate that assets deposited in the trust account must be valued in accordance with their current fair market value and must consist only of permitted investments;

(iii) If a trust arrangement is used, require the special purpose financial captive insurer, before depositing assets with the trustee, to execute assignments, to execute endorsements in blank, or to take such actions as are necessary to transfer legal title to the trustee of all shares, obligations, or other assets requiring assignments, in order that the counterparty, or the trustee upon the direction of the counterparty, may negotiate whenever necessary the assets without consent or signature from the special purpose financial captive insurer or another entity; and

(iv) If a trust arrangement is used, stipulate that the special purpose financial captive insurer and the counterparty agree that the assets in the trust account, established pursuant to the provisions of the special purpose financial captive insurer contract, may be withdrawn by the counterparty, or the trustee on its behalf, at any time, only in accordance with the terms of the special purpose financial captive insurer contract, and must be utilized and applied by the counterparty or any successor of the counterparty by operation of law, including, subject to the provisions of this section, but without further limitation, any liquidator, rehabilitator, or receiver of the counterparty, without diminution because of insolvency on the part of the counterparty or the special purpose financial captive insurer, only for the purposes set forth in the credit for reinsurance laws and rules and regulations of this state.

(d) The special purpose financial captive insurer contract may contain provisions that give the special purpose financial captive insurer the right to seek approval from the counterparty to withdraw from the trust all or part of the assets, or income from them, contained in the trust and to transfer the assets to the special purpose financial captive insurer if such provisions comply with the credit for reinsurance laws and rules and regulations of this state.

(9) A special purpose financial captive insurer contract meeting the provisions of this section must be granted credit for reinsurance treatment or otherwise qualify as an asset or a reduction from liability for reinsurance ceded by a domestic insurer to a special purpose financial captive insurer as an assuming insurer for the benefit of the counterparty if and only to the extent:

(a)(i) Of the value of:

(A) The assets held in trust;

(B) Clean, or irrevocable, unconditional letters of credit, issued or confirmed by a qualified United States financial institution as defined in section 44-416.08, or as approved by the director; or

(C) Guaranties of the parent; and

(ii) For the benefit of the counterparty under the special purpose financial captive insurer contract; and

(b) Assets of the special purpose financial captive insurer are held or invested in one or more of the forms allowed in section 44-8211.

(10)(a)(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, the director may apply to the district court of Lancaster County for an order authorizing the director to rehabilitate or liquidate a special purpose financial captive insurer domiciled in this state on one or more of the following grounds:

(A) There has been embezzlement, wrongful sequestration, dissipation, or diversion of the assets of the special purpose financial captive insurer intended to be used to pay amounts owed to the counterparty or the holders of special purpose financial captive insurer securities; or

(B) The special purpose financial captive insurer is insolvent and the holders of a majority in outstanding principal amount of each class of special purpose financial captive insurer securities request or consent to conservation, rehabilitation, or liquidation pursuant to the provisions of this section.

(ii) The court may not grant relief provided by subdivision (10)(a)(i) of this section unless, after notice and a hearing, the director establishes that relief must be granted.

(b) Notwithstanding any other applicable law, rule, or regulation, upon any order of rehabilitation or liquidation of a special purpose financial captive insurer, the receiver shall manage the assets and liabilities of the special purpose financial captive insurer pursuant to the provisions of subsection (11) of this section.

(c) With respect to amounts recoverable under a special purpose financial captive insurer contract, the amount recoverable by the receiver must not be reduced or diminished as a result of the entry of an order of conservation, rehabilitation, or liquidation with respect to the counterparty, notwithstanding another provision in the contracts or other documentation governing the special purpose financial captive insurer insurance securitization.

(d) An application or petition, or a temporary restraining order or injunction issued pursuant to the provisions of the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, with respect to a counterparty does not prohibit the transaction of a business by a special purpose financial captive insurer, including any payment by a special purpose financial captive insurer made pursuant to a special purpose financial captive insurer security, or any action or proceeding against a special purpose financial captive insurer or its assets.

(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of any applicable law or rule or regulation, the commencement of a summary proceeding or other interim proceeding commenced before a formal delinquency proceeding with respect to a special purpose financial captive insurer, and any order issued by the court, does not prohibit the payment by a special purpose financial captive insurer made pursuant to a special purpose financial captive insurer security or special purpose financial captive insurer contract or the special purpose financial captive insurer from taking any action required to make the payment.

(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other applicable law, rule, or regulation:

(i) A receiver of a counterparty may not void a nonfraudulent transfer by a counterparty to a special purpose financial captive insurer of money or other property made pursuant to a special purpose financial captive insurer contract; and

(ii) A receiver of a special purpose financial captive insurer may not void a nonfraudulent transfer by the special purpose financial captive insurer of money or other property made to a counterparty pursuant to a special purpose financial captive insurer contract or made to or for the benefit of any holder of a special purpose financial captive insurer security on account of the special purpose financial captive insurer security.

(g) With the exception of the fulfillment of the obligations under a special purpose financial captive insurer contract, and notwithstanding the provisions of any other applicable law or rule or regulation, the assets of a special purpose financial captive insurer, including assets held in trust, must not be consolidated with or included in the estate of a counterparty in any delinquency proceeding against the counterparty pursuant to the provisions of this section for any purpose including, without limitation, distribution to creditors of the counterparty.

(11) A special purpose financial captive insurer may not declare or pay dividends in any form to its owners other than in accordance with the insurance securitization transaction agreements, and in no instance shall the dividends decrease the capital of the special purpose financial captive insurer below two hundred fifty thousand dollars, and, after giving effect to the dividends, the assets of the special purpose financial captive insurer, including any assets held in trust pursuant to the terms of the insurance securitization, must be sufficient to satisfy the director that it can meet its obligations. Approval by the director of an ongoing plan for the payment of dividends, interest on securities, or other distribution by a special purpose financial captive insurer must be conditioned upon the retention, at the time of each payment, of capital or surplus equal to or in excess of amounts specified by, or determined in accordance with formulas approved for the special purpose financial captive insurer by, the director.

(12) Information submitted pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be given confidential treatment, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be made public by the director or any other person, except to other state, federal, foreign, and international regulatory and law enforcement agencies if the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality of the information, without the prior written consent of the special purpose financial captive insurer unless the director, after giving the special purpose financial captive insurer notice and opportunity to be heard, determines that the best interest of policyholders, shareholders, or the public will be served by the publication thereof, in which event he or she may publish all or any part thereof in such manner as he or she may deem appropriate.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 50;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 30;

Laws 2016, LB758, § 2.
July 21, 2016
Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.